Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Chapter 7 Food and Drugs

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

25 Am. Jur 2d Drugs, Narcotics and Poison § 1 et seq.; 35A Am. Jur. 2d Food § 1 et seq.

Validity of municipal ordinance imposing requirements on outside producers of milk to be sold in city, 14 ALR2d 103.

Validity and construction of statutes, ordinances, or regulations concerning the sale of horsemeat for human consumption, 19 ALR2d 1013.

Liability of seller of cosmetics for injuries on theory of breach of warranty as affected by buyer's or user's allergy or unusual susceptibility to injury from article, 26 ALR2d 963.

Conflict of administration as between Federal Trade Commission and Food and Drug Administration, 65 ALR2d 225.

Dairy, creamery or milk distributing plant, as nuisance, 92 ALR2d 974.

“Brand name” or original-package nonprescription remedies, validity of statutory regulation prohibiting sales of medicines or drugs other than by pharmacies or pharmacists, as applied to sales of, 98 ALR2d 1063.

Liability under Federal Employers' Liability Act (45 U.S.C. § 51 et seq.) for industrial or occupational disease or poisoning, 30 ALR3d 735.

Validity and construction of regulations dealing with misrepresentation in the sale of kosher food, 52 ALR3d 959.

Liability of manufacturer or seller for injury or death allegedly caused by failure to warn regarding danger in use of vaccine, 94 ALR3d 748.

Drug manufacturer's promotion of product as affecting its liability for product-caused injury, 94 ALR3d 1080.

Liability of packer, food store or restaurant for causing trichinosis, 96 ALR3d 451.

Strict products liability: liability for failure to warn as dependent on defendant's knowledge of danger, 33 ALR4th 368.

Products liability: sufficiency of evidence to support product misuse defense in actions concerning food, drugs and other products intended for ingestion, 58 ALR4th 7.

Products liability: mascara and other eye cosmetics, 63 ALR4th 105.

Liability of manufacturer of oral live polio (Sabin) vaccine for injury or death from its administration, 66 ALR4th 83.

Liability for injury or death allegedly caused by spoilage, contamination or other deleterious condition of food or food product, 2 ALR5th 1.

Liability for injury or death allegedly caused by food product containing object related to, but not intended to be present in, product, 2 ALR5th 189.

Products liability: admissibility of evidence of subsequent repairs or other remedial measures by third party other than defendant, 64 ALR5th 119.

Validity, construction, and application of color additive provisions of Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, as amended (21 U.S.C. §§ 321 (t), (u), 362 (a), (e), 376), and of implementing regulations, 12 ALR Fed 475.

Construction and application of Food Stamp Act of 1964 (7 U.S.C. § 2011 et seq.) establishing food stamp program, 13 ALR Fed 369.

Regulation of health devices under Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. § 301 et seq.) as affected by religious guaranties of First Amendment, 13 ALR Fed 747.

Validity of inspection conducted under provisions of Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. § 374 (a)) authorizing FDA inspectors to enter and inspect food, drug or cosmetic factory, warehouse, or other establishment, 18 ALR Fed 734.

Validity, construction, and application of provision of § 507(f) of Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 U.S.C. § 357 (f)) [repealed] requiring person objecting to proposed repeal or amendment of regulation providing for certification of antibiotic drugs, to state “reasonable grounds” therefor, 22 ALR Fed 883.

Liability of United States under Federal Tort Claims Act (28 U.S.C. §§ 1346, 2671-2680), for damages caused by ingestion or administration of drugs, vaccines, and the like, approved as safe for use by government agency, 24 ALR Fed 467.

Exemption from provision of § 502(f) of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 USC § 352(f)) that drug or device is misbranded unless its label bears “adequate directions for use,” 65 ALR Fed 725.

Federal preemption of state food labeling legislation or regulation, 79 ALR Fed 181.

Validity, under commerce clause (art. I, § 8, cl. 3), of state statutes regulating labeling of food,
79 ALR Fed 246.

Sufficiency of showing, in prosecution under Travel Act (18 USC § 1952), of act by accused, subsequent to accused's travel or use of facilities in interstate or foreign commerce, which furthers unlawful activity involving narcotics or controlled substances, 113 ALR Fed 625.

What is “new drug” within meaning of § 201(p) of Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (21 USCS § 321(p)), 133 ALR Fed 229.

28 Supp. C.J.S. Drugs and Narcotics §§ 8, 9, 72, 73, 84 to 90; 36A C.J.S. Food § 1 et seq.